Nevada, session 83, AB412.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 414 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Account for the Nevada School Safety Data Grant
Program is hereby created in the State General Fund. The Chief
or a designee of the Chief shall administer the Account. The
money in the Account must only be used for the purposes
described in subsection 5 and is hereby authorized for
expenditures as a continuing appropriation for those purposes.
2. The money in the Account that is provided from sources
other than the State General Fund must remain in the Account
and must not revert to the State General Fund at the end of any
fiscal year. Money in the Account that is appropriated or allocated
from the State General Fund must revert as provided in the
legislation that authorizes the appropriation or the allocation.
3. The Chief or designee may apply for and accept any gift,
donation, bequest, grant or other source of money for the use of
the Account. All money received for the use of the Account
pursuant to this subsection or from any other source must be
deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the Account.
4. A political subdivision may make a grant of money for
credit to the Account. Such money must be used for the purposes
described in subsection 5, but solely with respect to public schools
located within the jurisdiction of the political subdivision.
5. A law enforcement agency, in consultation with the school
district in the county in which the law enforcement agency is
located, may apply to the Division for a grant of money from the
Account. A law enforcement agency receiving a grant of money
-
*AB412_R1*

– 3 –
from the Account shall use the money to provide school mapping
data for public schools in the jurisdiction of the law enforcement
agency for the purpose of facilitating an efficient and effective
response to emergencies in those public schools by public safety
agencies by contracting with a vendor to provide such school
mapping data.
6. The school mapping data provided pursuant to subsection
5 must:
(a) Be compatible with software platforms used by any
municipal, state or federal public safety agencies which are
responsible for providing emergency services to schools in the
school district without requiring a public safety agency to
purchase additional software or pay a fee to access the data;
(b) Be in a printable format in addition to an electronic or
digital format that can be integrated into an interactive mobile
platform in use by public safety agencies;
(c) Be verified for accuracy by the entity that produces the
school mapping data by a walk-through of the buildings and
grounds of the public school;
(d) Be oriented true north and overlaid with gridded x and y
coordinates for reference, and capture z-axis elevation data for
each floor of the public school;
(e) Contain site-specific labeling that matches the structure of
school buildings, including, without limitation, room labels,
hallway names, external doors or stairwell numbers, locations of
hazards, critical utility locations, key boxes, automated external
defibrillators and trauma kits;
(f) Contain site-specific labeling that matches the school
grounds, including, without limitation, parking areas, athletic
fields, surrounding roads and neighboring properties; and
(g) Be provided to the school district and public safety agencies
in the county in which the school district is located at no
additional cost beyond the initial cost of production of the school
mapping data.
7. A vendor that contracts with a law enforcement agency
pursuant to this section must:
(a) Comply with Special Publications 800-45, 800-53, 800-61
and 800-171 published by the National Institute of Standards and
Technology of the United States Department of Commerce.
(b) Ensure that all aspects of the process of creating school
mapping data are developed and maintained within the geographic
boundaries of the United States or any territory or possession
subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
8. School mapping data produced pursuant to this section:
(a) Shall be deemed the property of the school district.
-
*AB412_R1*

– 4 –
(b) Is confidential and must not be disclosed to any person
except to an employee of the school district, a public safety agency
or the Division as necessary to enhance the efficiency and
effectiveness of the response to emergencies at a public school.
9. The Chief may accept in-kind gifts or donations to assist
law enforcement agencies in providing school mapping data for
public schools.
10. The Division shall adopt regulations necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section, including, without limitation,
regulations to ensure compliance with the requirements for the
use of money from grants received from the Account pursuant to
this section.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Law enforcement agency” means an agency, office or
bureau of this State or a political subdivision of this State, the
primary duty of which is to enforce the law.
(b) “Public safety agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388.2345.
(c) “Public school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 385.007.
(d) “School mapping data” means structural data in a
printable format in addition to an electronic or digital format of
school buildings and grounds, including, without limitation, floor
plans, aerial imagery and site-specific labels identifying rooms,
hallways, stairwells and emergency resources to assist a public
safety agency in responding to emergencies at a public or private
school.
(e) “Software platforms” means the digital tools and systems
used by a public safety agency to access, share and use school
mapping data and related emergency information.
Sec. 1.1. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
-
*AB412_R1*

– 5 –
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
-
*AB412_R1*

– 6 –
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 1 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
-
*AB412_R1*

– 7 –
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 1.3. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. To permit emergency access by public safety agencies to
the premises of a public school, the board of trustees of a school
district or the governing body of a charter school may provide for
the installation at public schools in the school district or the
charter school, as applicable, of a secure, exterior master key box
that meets the requirements of Underwriters Laboratories Inc.
Standard 1037, “Antitheft Alarms and Devices.”
-
*AB412_R1*

– 8 –
2. If the board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school intends to provide for the installation of a
master key box pursuant to this section, the board of trustees or
the governing body shall consult with the public safety agencies
responsible for providing emergency services to schools in the
school district or the charter school, as applicable, to determine
the location to install the master key box.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 388.229 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.229 As used in NRS 388.229 to 388.266, inclusive, and
section 1.3 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 388.231 to 388.2359, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 1.7. Chapter 394 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. To permit emergency access by public safety agencies to
the premises of a private school, the governing body of a private
school may provide for the installation at the private school of a
secure, exterior master key box that meets the requirements of
Underwriters Laboratories Inc. Standard 1037, “Antitheft Alarms
and Devices.”
2. If the governing body of a private school intends to provide
for the installation of a master key box pursuant to this section,
the governing body shall consult with the public safety agencies
responsible for providing emergency services to the private school
to determine the location to install the master key box.
Sec. 1.9. NRS 394.168 is hereby amended to read as follows:
394.168 As used in NRS 394.168 to 394.1699, inclusive, and
section 1.7 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 394.1681 to 394.1684, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 2, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting
regulations and performing other preparatory administrative tasks
that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB412_R1*